Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5236.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 508. (1) "Gross rent" means the total rent contracted to
be paid by the renter or lessee of a homestead pursuant to dealing
at arms' length with the landlord of the homestead. When If the
landlord and tenant have not dealt with each other at arms' length
and the department believes that the gross rent charged is
excessive, the department may adjust the gross rent to a reasonable
amount for the purposes of this chapter.
(2) "Homestead" means a dwelling or unit in a multiple-unit
dwelling that is subject to ad valorem taxes, or a service charge
KAS H04316'25 (H-1) 6b8tsu


in lieu of taxes as provided by section 15a of the state housing
development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1415a,
owned and occupied as a home by the owner of the dwelling or unit,
or occupied as the dwelling of the renter or lessee, including all
unoccupied real property not classified for ad valorem tax purposes
as commercial, industrial, residential, or timber-cut over, owned
by the owner of the homestead. Beginning in the 1990 tax year, a A
homestead does not include unoccupied real property that is leased
or rented by the owner to another person and that is not adjacent
and contiguous to the home of the owner. Additionally, all of the
following apply:
(a) If a homestead is an integral part of a larger unit of
assessment such as commercial, industrial, residential, timber-cut
over, or a multipurpose or multidwelling building, the tax on the
homestead shall be is the same proportion of the total property tax
as the proportion of the value of the homestead is to the total
value of the assessed property.
(b) If the gross receipts of the agricultural or horticultural
operations do not exceed the household income, or if there are no
gross receipts, the following apply:
(i) If the claimant has lived on the land 10 years or more, all
of the adjacent and contiguous agricultural or horticultural lands
shall be is considered a homestead and the credit is allowed for
all the land.
(ii) If the claimant has lived on the land less than 10 years,
not more than 5 acres of adjacent and contiguous agricultural or
horticultural land shall be is considered a part of the homestead
and the credit is allowed for that part of the land.
(c) A mobile home or trailer coach in a trailer coach park is
KAS H04316'25 (H-1) 6b8tsu


a homestead and the site rent for space is considered the rent of a
homestead. The specific tax levied by section 41 of 1959 PA 243,
MCL 125.1041, is considered a property tax.
(3) "Household" means a claimant and spouse.
(4) "Total household resources" means all income received by
all persons of a household in a tax year while members of a
household, excluding for tax years beginning after December 31,
2018 any compensation received pursuant to under the wrongful
imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to
691.1757, and increased by the following deductions from federal
gross income:
(a) Any net business loss after netting all business income
and loss.
(b) Any net rental or royalty loss.
(c) Any carryback or carryforward of a net operating loss as
defined described in section 172(b)(2) of the internal revenue
code.
Final Page
KAS H04316'25 (H-1) 6b8tsu